Georgia statutes. TITLE 31 Health
Article 2 Licenses

Cross references.

Drivers’ licenses generally, T. 40, C. 5.

31-11-30.
License requirement.

No person shall operate an ambulance service in this state without having a valid license or provisional license issued by the license officer pursuant to this chapter.

No person shall make use of the word “ambulance” to describe any ground or air transportation or facility or service associated therewith which such person provides or to otherwise hold oneself out to be an ambulance service unless such person has a valid license issued pursuant to the provisions of this chapter or is exempt from licensing under this chapter and is not the operator of an invalid car.

Any person who violates the provisions of this Code section shall be guilty of a misdemeanor.

History.

Code 1933, §§ 88-3102, 88-3113, enacted by Ga. L. 1972, p. 625, § 1; Ga. L. 1991, p. 597, § 1; Ga. L. 1994, p. 800, § 2; Ga. L. 2003, p. 304, § 6.

31-11-31.
Application for license.

An application for a license or provisional license shall be made to the license officer. The application shall be made upon forms prescribed by the license officer and shall contain the following:

The name and address of the owner of the ambulance service or proposed ambulance service;

The name under which the applicant is doing business or proposes to do business;

The training and experience of the applicant in the transportation and care of patients;

A description or photograph of each ambulance, including the make, model, year of manufacture, and motor and chassis number; and the color scheme, insignia, name, monogram, or other distinguishing characteristics to be used to designate the applicant’s ambulance or ambulances;

(4.1)

A description or photograph of each air ambulance, including the color scheme, insignia, name, monogram, or other distinguishing characteristics to be used to designate the applicant’s air ambulance or air ambulances; and

The location and description of the place or places from which the ambulance service is intended to operate.

History.

Code 1933, § 88-3103, enacted by Ga. L. 1972, p. 625, § 1; Ga. L. 1981, p. 1898, § 4; Ga. L. 1982, p. 3, § 31; Ga. L. 1993, p. 468, § 1; Ga. L. 1994, p. 97, § 31; Ga. L. 2003, p. 304, § 7.

31-11-31.1.
License fee.

Every ambulance service, whether privately operated or operated by any political subdivision of the state or any municipality, as a condition of maintaining a valid license shall pay an annual license fee to the license officer in an amount to be determined by the Board of Public Health. The amount of said license fee may be periodically revised by said board. Said license fee shall become due and payable upon the initial issuance of the license and each year thereafter on the anniversary date of the initial license issuance.

All revenues collected from this annual fee shall be dedicated and deposited into the Indigent Care Trust Fund by the licensing officer.

History.

Code 1981, §

31-11-31.1

, enacted by Ga. L. 1993, p. 468, § 2; Ga. L. 2009, p. 453, § 1-5/HB 228; Ga. L. 2011, p. 705, § 6-4/HB 214.

Code Commission notes.

Pursuant to Code Section 28-9-5, in 1993, this Code section was renumbered as Code Section 31-11-31.1. Ga. L. 1993, p. 468, § 2, had designated it as Code Section 31-11-33.1.

Law reviews.

For article on the 2011 amendment of this Code section, see 28 Ga. St. U.L. Rev. 147 (2011).

31-11-31.2.
Ambulance service provider matching payment; segregated account; appropriations from segregated account; audits; rules and regulations.

As used in this Code section, the term:

“Ambulance service” means an entity licensed by the Department of Public Health pursuant to this chapter.

“Board” means the Board of Community Health.

“Department” means the Department of Community Health.

“Provider matching payment” means a payment assessed by the board pursuant to this Code section on providers which operate an ambulance service.

The board shall be authorized to establish and assess, by board rule, one or more provider matching payments on a subclass of ambulance services, as defined by the board; provided, however, that if any such provider matching payment is established and assessed, the provider matching payment shall comply with the requirements of 42 C.F.R. 433.68. Any provider matching payment assessed pursuant to this Code section shall not exceed the amount necessary to obtain federal financial participation allowable under Title XIX of the federal Social Security Act.

The board shall be authorized to discontinue any provider matching payment assessed pursuant to this Code section. The board shall cease to impose any such provider matching payment if:

The provider matching payments are not eligible for federal matching funds under Title XIX of the federal Social Security Act; or

The department, as a direct result of the enactment of this Code section, reduces or supplants Medicaid payment rates to ambulance providers as such rates are in effect on June 30, 2021, or reduces or supplants the provider matching payment rate adjustment factors utilized in developing the state Fiscal Year 2021 capitated rates for Medicaid managed care organizations.

Any provider matching payments assessed pursuant to this Code section shall be deposited into a segregated account within the Indigent Care Trust Fund created pursuant to Code Section 31-8-152 and used solely for the purpose of obtaining federal financial participation for medical assistance payments to providers on behalf of Medicaid recipients pursuant to Article 7 of Chapter 4 of Title 49. Any funds deposited into such segregated account pursuant to this Code section shall be subject to appropriation by the General Assembly.

The department shall be authorized to impose a penalty of up to 6 percent on the amount of any owed provider matching payments for any ambulance service that fails to pay a provider matching payment within the time required by the department for each month, or fraction thereof, that such provider matching payment is overdue. If a required provider matching payment has not been received by the department in accordance with department timelines, the department shall withhold an amount equal to the provider matching payment and penalty owed from any medical assistance payment due such ambulance service under the Medicaid program. Any provider matching payment assessed pursuant to this Code section shall constitute a debt due the state and may be collected by civil action and the filing of tax liens in addition to such methods provided for in this Code section. Any penalty that accrues pursuant to this subsection shall be credited to the applicable segregated account.

Notwithstanding any other provision of Chapter 8 of this title, the General Assembly is authorized to appropriate as state funds to the department for use in any fiscal year all revenues dedicated and deposited into one or more segregated accounts. Such appropriations shall be authorized to be made for the sole purpose of obtaining federal financial participation for medical assistance payments to providers on behalf of Medicaid recipients pursuant to Article 7 of Chapter 4 of Title 49. Any appropriation from a segregated account for any purpose other than such medical assistance payments shall be void.

Revenues appropriated to the department pursuant to this Code section shall be used to match federal funds that are available for the purpose for which such funds have been appropriated.

Appropriations from a segregated account to the department shall not lapse to the general fund at the end of the fiscal year.

The department shall have the authority to inspect and copy the records of an ambulance service for purposes of auditing the calculation of the provider matching payment. All information obtained by the department pursuant to this Code section shall be confidential and shall not constitute a public record.

The board shall be authorized to establish rules and regulations to assess and collect any such provider matching payments, including, but not limited to, payment frequency and schedules, required information to be submitted, and record retention.

The provider matching payment provided for in this Code section shall be in addition to any license fee or fees imposed on an ambulance service pursuant to Code Section 31-11-31.1.

History.

Code 1981, §

31-11-31.2

, enacted by Ga. L. 2021, p. 375, § 1/HB 271.

Effective date. —

This Code section became effective July 1, 2021.

31-11-32.
Duties of license officer.

The license officer shall, within ten days after receipt of an application for a license or provisional license as provided for in this article, cause such investigation as he deems necessary to be made to determine that the standards prescribed by this chapter have been met.

The license officer shall issue a license under this article for a period of two years, unless earlier suspended, revoked, or terminated, when he finds that all the requirements of this article have been met.

The license officer shall issue provisional licenses for 30 days for the purpose specified in paragraph (19) of Code Section 31-11-2.

Before issuing a license to a government or governmental agency for a new ambulance service, the license officer shall establish that, due to inadequate private service, the public’s convenience and necessity require the proposed ambulance service.

History.

Code 1933, § 88-3104, enacted by Ga. L. 1972, p. 625, § 1.

31-11-33.
Insurance coverage as condition of licensing.

Every ambulance operated on the streets, highways, and private access roads of this state by persons engaged in providing ambulance service shall have insurance coverage issued by an insurance company licensed to do business in this state providing at least the minimum coverage required for motor vehicles under Chapter 34 of Title 33; provided, however, in the case of ambulances operated by the state, the coverage required shall be the same coverage required for other state vehicles under Chapter 9 of Title 45. Every air ambulance operated by persons engaged in providing air ambulance service in this state shall have insurance coverage as described in Code Section 33-7-9.

No ambulance shall be licensed nor shall any license be renewed unless the ambulance has insurance coverage in force as required by this Code section. A certificate of insurance shall be submitted to the license officer for approval prior to the issuance or renewal of each ambulance license. Satisfactory evidence that such insurance is at all times in force and effect shall be furnished to the license officer, in such form as he may specify, by all licensees required to provide such insurance under this Code section.

This Code section shall apply to all ambulances, whether privately operated or operated by any political subdivision of the state or any municipality.

This Code section shall not apply to first responders, which do not transport patients, operated by municipalities or counties that have not elected to waive their governmental immunity by purchasing vehicle liability insurance pursuant to Code Section 33-24-51.

History.

Code 1933, § 88-3104.1, enacted by Ga. L. 1975, p. 916, § 1; Ga. L. 1986, p. 1321, § 1; Ga. L. 1987, p. 542, § 4; Ga. L. 2003, p. 304, § 8.

Law reviews.

For annual survey of local government law, see 38 Mercer L. Rev. 289 (1986).

31-11-34.
Standards for ambulances.

Ambulances operated by persons engaged in providing ambulance service shall meet all standards as set forth in the department’s rules and regulations.

History.

Code 1933, § 88-3105, enacted by Ga. L. 1972, p. 625, § 1; Ga. L. 1975, p. 916, § 2; Ga. L. 2003, p. 304, § 9.

31-11-35.
Renewal of license; change of ownership of ambulance service.

Renewal of any license issued under this article shall require conformance with the requirements of this article as upon original licensing.

Change of ownership of an ambulance service shall require a new application and a new license issued in conformance with the requirements of this article as upon original licensing.

History.

Code 1933, § 88-3106, enacted by Ga. L. 1972, p. 625, § 1.

31-11-36.
Suspension or revocation of license; appeal to superior court.

Any license issued under this article may be suspended or revoked for a failure of a licensee to comply and to maintain compliance with this article or rules and regulations issued under this article, but only after opportunity for a hearing as provided in Article 1 of Chapter 5 of this title.

Any person who has exhausted all administrative remedies available within the department and who is substantially aggrieved by a final order or final action of the license officer is entitled to judicial review in the manner provided by Article 1 of Chapter 5 of this title and, notwithstanding Code Section 31-5-3, shall be entitled to an appeal to superior court as provided in subsection (c) of this Code section.

Appeal to the superior court shall be by petition which shall be filed in the clerk’s office of such court within 30 days after the final order or action of the department; the petition shall set forth the names of the parties taking the appeal, the order, rule, regulation, or decision appealed from, and the reason it is claimed to be erroneous. The enforcement of the order or action appealed from shall be automatically stayed upon the filing of such petition unless the commissioner of public health in his final order certifies that his decision if stayed will harm the public health and safety, in which case a reviewing court may order a stay only if the court makes a finding that the public health and safety will not be harmed by the issuance of the stay. Upon the filing of such petition, the petitioner shall serve on the commissioner a copy thereof in the manner prescribed by law for the service of process, unless such service of process is waived. The appeal shall be an appeal de novo to the superior court and the appealing party shall have a right to a jury trial and all rights provided under Chapter 11 of Title 9, the “Georgia Civil Practice Act.” The superior court shall render a decision approving, setting aside, or modifying the order or action appealed from.

History.

Code 1933, § 88-3107, enacted by Ga. L. 1972, p. 625, § 1; Ga. L. 1985, p. 149, § 31; Ga. L. 1988, p. 1923, § 2; Ga. L. 2009, p. 453, § 1-6/HB 228; Ga. L. 2011, p. 705, § 6-5/HB 214.

Law reviews.

For article on the 2011 amendment of this Code section, see 28 Ga. St. U.L. Rev. 147 (2011).